Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1233
Personal property; statement required on return; signature by taxpayer.

Each schedule or statement required by law to be filed with respect to taxation of personal property shall have the following printed thereon and signed by the taxpayer or his agent:

Taxpayer or Agent—I declare that this (schedule or return) and any accompanying schedule and statements have been examined by me and to the best of my knowledge and belief are a true, correct, and complete return.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 53, p. 402;

R.S.1913, § 6340;

C.S.1922, § 5942;

C.S.1929, § 77-1429;

R.S.1943, § 77-1233;

Laws 1959, c. 365, § 10, p. 1289;

Laws 1961, c. 377, § 5, p. 1158.